Washington statutes.
RCW 18.155.030

Certificate required.

(1) No person shall represent himself or herself as a certified sex offender treatment provider or certified affiliate sex offender treatment provider without first applying for and receiving a certificate pursuant to this chapter.

(2) Only a certified sex offender treatment provider, or certified affiliate sex offender treatment provider who has completed at least fifty percent of the required hours under the supervision of a qualified supervisor, may perform or provide the following services:

(a) Treatment or evaluation of convicted level III sex offenders who are sentenced and ordered into treatment pursuant to chapter 9.94A RCW and adjudicated level III juvenile sex offenders who are ordered into treatment pursuant to chapter 13.40 RCW; or

(b) Except as provided under subsection (3) of this section, treatment of sexually violent predators who are conditionally released to a less restrictive alternative pursuant to chapter 71.09 RCW.

(3) A certified sex offender treatment provider, or certified affiliate sex offender treatment provider who has completed at least fifty percent of the required hours under the supervision of a qualified supervisor, may not perform or provide treatment of sexually violent predators under subsection (2)(b) of this section if the treatment provider has been:

(a) Convicted of a sex offense, as defined in RCW 9.94A.030;

(b) Convicted in any other jurisdiction of an offense that under the laws of this state would be classified as a sex offense as defined in RCW 9.94A.030; or

(c) Suspended or otherwise restricted from practicing any health care profession by competent authority in any state, federal, or foreign jurisdiction.

(4) Certified sex offender treatment providers and certified affiliate sex offender treatment providers may perform or provide the following service: Treatment or evaluation of convicted level I and level II sex offenders who are sentenced and ordered into treatment pursuant to chapter 9.94A RCW and adjudicated juvenile level I and level II sex offenders who are sentenced and ordered into treatment pursuant to chapter 13.40 RCW.

(5) Employees of state-run facilities or state-run treatment programs are not required to be a certified sex offender treatment provider or a certified affiliate sex offender treatment provider to do the work described in this section as part of their job duties if not pursuing certification under this chapter.

(6) Individuals credentialed by the department of health as a certified sex offender treatment provider or a certified affiliate sex offender treatment provider prior to June 11, 2020, are considered to have met the requirement of holding an underlying health license or credential described in RCW 18.155.020 (2) and (3), provided the underlying license or credential remains active and in good standing.

[ 2020 c 266 s 2; 2004 c 38 s 4; 2001 2nd sp.s. c 12 s 402. Prior: 2000 c 171 s 34; 2000 c 28 s 39; 1990 c 3 s 803.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2004 c 38: See note following RCW 18.155.075.

Intent—Severability—Effective dates—2001 2nd sp.s. c 12: See notes following RCW 71.09.250.

Technical correction bill—2000 c 28: See note following RCW 9.94A.015.

Effective date—2000 c 28: See RCW 9.94A.921.